Generated/uz.aff
FLAG long
# OT/KO'PLIK : LAR:1SHB:TSH
SFX Av Y 40
SFX Av 0 larimni .
SFX Av 0 larimning .
SFX Av 0 larimda .
SFX Av 0 larimdan .
SFX Av 0 larimdagi .
SFX Av 0 larimdagidek .
SFX Av 0 larimga .
SFX Av 0 larimgacha .
SFX Av 0 larimizni .
SFX Av 0 larimizning .
SFX Av 0 larimizda .
SFX Av 0 larimizdan .
SFX Av 0 larimizdagi .
SFX Av 0 larimizdagidek .
SFX Av 0 larimizga .
SFX Av 0 larimizgacha .
SFX Av 0 laringni .
SFX Av 0 laringning .
SFX Av 0 laringda .
SFX Av 0 laringdan .
SFX Av 0 laringdagi .
SFX Av 0 laringdagidek .
SFX Av 0 laringga .
SFX Av 0 laringgacha .
SFX Av 0 laringizni .
SFX Av 0 laringizning .
SFX Av 0 laringizda .
SFX Av 0 laringizdan .
SFX Av 0 laringizdagi .
SFX Av 0 laringizdagidek .
SFX Av 0 laringizga .
SFX Av 0 laringizgacha .
SFX Av 0 larini .
SFX Av 0 larining .
SFX Av 0 larida .
SFX Av 0 laridan .
SFX Av 0 laridagi .
SFX Av 0 laridagidek .
SFX Av 0 lariga .
SFX Av 0 larigacha .

# OT/KICHRAYTMA : CHA:LAR:1SHB:TSH
SFX Aw Y 120
SFX Aw 0 chalarimni .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimning .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimda .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimdan .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimdagi .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimga .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimgacha .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizni .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizning .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizda .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizdan .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizga .
SFX Aw 0 chalarimizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringni .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringning .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringda .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringdan .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringdagi .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringga .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringgacha .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizni .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizning .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizda .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizdan .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizga .
SFX Aw 0 chalaringizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 chalarini .
SFX Aw 0 chalarining .
SFX Aw 0 chalarida .
SFX Aw 0 chalaridan .
SFX Aw 0 chalaridagi .
SFX Aw 0 chalaridagidek .
SFX Aw 0 chalariga .
SFX Aw 0 chalarigacha .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimni .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimning .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimda .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimdan .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimdagi .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimga .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimgacha .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizni .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizning .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizda .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizdan .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizga .
SFX Aw 0 deklarimizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringni .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringning .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringda .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringdan .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringdagi .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringga .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringgacha .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizni .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizning .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizda .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizdan .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizga .
SFX Aw 0 deklaringizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 deklarini .
SFX Aw 0 deklarining .
SFX Aw 0 deklarida .
SFX Aw 0 deklaridan .
SFX Aw 0 deklaridagi .
SFX Aw 0 deklaridagidek .
SFX Aw 0 deklariga .
SFX Aw 0 deklarigacha .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimni .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimning .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimda .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimdan .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimdagi .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimga .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimgacha .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizni .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizning .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizda .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizdan .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizga .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarimizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringni .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringning .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringda .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringdan .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringdagi .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringga .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringgacha .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizni .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizning .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizda .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizdan .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizdagi .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizdagidek .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizga .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaringizgacha .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarini .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarining .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarida .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaridan .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaridagi .
SFX Aw 0 simonlaridagidek .
SFX Aw 0 simonlariga .
SFX Aw 0 simonlarigacha .

# OT/YUKLAMA : MI?
SFX Ax Y 8
SFX Ax 0 mi .
SFX Ax 0 chi .
SFX Ax 0 dir .
SFX Ax 0 da .
SFX Ax 0 ku .
SFX Ax 0 mikan .
SFX Ax 0 midi .
SFX Ax 0 dirda .

# OT/KICHRAYTMA : CHA:MI?
SFX Ay Y 24
SFX Ay 0 chami .
SFX Ay 0 chachi .
SFX Ay 0 chadir .
SFX Ay 0 chada .
SFX Ay 0 chaku .
SFX Ay 0 chamikan .
SFX Ay 0 chamidi .
SFX Ay 0 chadirda .
SFX Ay 0 dekmi .
SFX Ay 0 dekchi .
SFX Ay 0 dekdir .
SFX Ay 0 dekda .
SFX Ay 0 dekku .
SFX Ay 0 dekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 dekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 dekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 simonmi .
SFX Ay 0 simonchi .
SFX Ay 0 simondir .
SFX Ay 0 simonda .
SFX Ay 0 simonku .
SFX Ay 0 simonmikan .
SFX Ay 0 simonmidi .
SFX Ay 0 simondirda .

# OT/KO'PLIK : LAR:MI?
SFX Az Y 8
SFX Az 0 larmi .
SFX Az 0 larchi .
SFX Az 0 lardir .
SFX Az 0 larda .
SFX Az 0 larku .
SFX Az 0 larmikan .
SFX Az 0 larmidi .
SFX Az 0 lardirda .

# OT/KICHRAYTMA : CHA:LAR:MI?
SFX BA Y 24
SFX BA 0 chalarmi .
SFX BA 0 chalarchi .
SFX BA 0 chalardir .
SFX BA 0 chalarda .
SFX BA 0 chalarku .
SFX BA 0 chalarmikan .
SFX BA 0 chalarmidi .
SFX BA 0 chalardirda .
SFX BA 0 deklarmi .
SFX BA 0 deklarchi .
SFX BA 0 deklardir .
SFX BA 0 deklarda .
SFX BA 0 deklarku .
SFX BA 0 deklarmikan .
SFX BA 0 deklarmidi .
SFX BA 0 deklardirda .
SFX BA 0 simonlarmi .
SFX BA 0 simonlarchi .
SFX BA 0 simonlardir .
SFX BA 0 simonlarda .
SFX BA 0 simonlarku .
SFX BA 0 simonlarmikan .
SFX BA 0 simonlarmidi .
SFX BA 0 simonlardirda .

# OT/EGALIK : 1SHB:MI?
SFX BB Y 200
SFX BB q g‘immi q
SFX BB q g‘imchi q
SFX BB q g‘imdir q
SFX BB q g‘imda q
SFX BB q g‘imku q
SFX BB q g‘immikan q
SFX BB q g‘immidi q
SFX BB q g‘imdirda q
SFX BB q g‘imizmi q
SFX BB q g‘imizchi q
SFX BB q g‘imizdir q
SFX BB q g‘imizda q
SFX BB q g‘imizku q
SFX BB q g‘imizmikan q
SFX BB q g‘imizmidi q
SFX BB q g‘imizdirda q
SFX BB q g‘ingmi q
SFX BB q g‘ingchi q
SFX BB q g‘ingdir q
SFX BB q g‘ingda q
SFX BB q g‘ingku q
SFX BB q g‘ingmikan q
SFX BB q g‘ingmidi q
SFX BB q g‘ingdirda q
SFX BB q g‘ingizmi q
SFX BB q g‘ingizchi q
SFX BB q g‘ingizdir q
SFX BB q g‘ingizda q
SFX BB q g‘ingizku q
SFX BB q g‘ingizmikan q
SFX BB q g‘ingizmidi q
SFX BB q g‘ingizdirda q
SFX BB q g‘imi q
SFX BB q g‘ichi q
SFX BB q g‘idir q
SFX BB q g‘ida q
SFX BB q g‘iku q
SFX BB q g‘imikan q
SFX BB q g‘imidi q
SFX BB q g‘idirda q
SFX BB k gimmi k
SFX BB k gimchi k
SFX BB k gimdir k
SFX BB k gimda k
SFX BB k gimku k
SFX BB k gimmikan k
SFX BB k gimmidi k
SFX BB k gimdirda k
SFX BB k gimizmi k
SFX BB k gimizchi k
SFX BB k gimizdir k
SFX BB k gimizda k
SFX BB k gimizku k
SFX BB k gimizmikan k
SFX BB k gimizmidi k
SFX BB k gimizdirda k
SFX BB k gingmi k
SFX BB k gingchi k
SFX BB k gingdir k
SFX BB k gingda k
SFX BB k gingku k
SFX BB k gingmikan k
SFX BB k gingmidi k
SFX BB k gingdirda k
SFX BB k gingizmi k
SFX BB k gingizchi k
SFX BB k gingizdir k
SFX BB k gingizda k
SFX BB k gingizku k
SFX BB k gingizmikan k
SFX BB k gingizmidi k
SFX BB k gingizdirda k
SFX BB k gimi k
SFX BB k gichi k
SFX BB k gidir k
SFX BB k gida k
SFX BB k giku k
SFX BB k gimikan k
SFX BB k gimidi k
SFX BB k gidirda k
SFX BB 0 mmi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mchi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mdir [ai]
SFX BB 0 mda [ai]
SFX BB 0 mku [ai]
SFX BB 0 mmikan [ai]
SFX BB 0 mmidi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mdirda [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizmi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizchi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizdir [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizda [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizku [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizmikan [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizmidi [ai]
SFX BB 0 mizdirda [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngmi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngchi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngdir [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngda [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngku [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngmikan [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngmidi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngdirda [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizmi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizchi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizdir [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizda [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizku [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizmikan [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizmidi [ai]
SFX BB 0 ngizdirda [ai]
SFX BB 0 simi [ai]
SFX BB 0 sichi [ai]
SFX BB 0 sidir [ai]
SFX BB 0 sida [ai]
SFX BB 0 siku [ai]
SFX BB 0 simikan [ai]
SFX BB 0 simidi [ai]
SFX BB 0 sidirda [ai]
SFX BB 0 yimmi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimchi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimdir [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimku [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimmikan [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimmidi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimdirda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizmi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizchi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizdir [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizku [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizmikan [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizmidi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yimizdirda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingmi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingchi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingdir [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingku [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingmikan [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingmidi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingdirda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizmi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizchi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizdir [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizku [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizmikan [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizmidi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 yingizdirda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 simi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 sichi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 sidir [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 sida [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 siku [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 simikan [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 simidi [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 sidirda [eou‘]
SFX BB 0 immi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imchi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imdir [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imku [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 immikan [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 immidi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imdirda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizmi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizchi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizdir [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizku [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizmikan [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizmidi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imizdirda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingmi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingchi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingdir [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingku [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingmikan [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingmidi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingdirda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizmi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizchi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizdir [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizku [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizmikan [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizmidi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ingizdirda [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ichi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 idir [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 ida [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 iku [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imikan [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 imidi [^aieouqk‘]
SFX BB 0 idirda [^aieouqk‘]
